Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201386-158
Appeals.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 86-123, any order
of the commission entered pursuant to authority granted in the Nebraska Telecommunications
Regulation Act may be appealed by any interested party to the proceeding.
The appeal shall be in accordance with section
75-136.

(2) In an original action concerning a violation of the Nebraska
Telecommunications Regulation Act by a telecommunications company, the commission
shall have jurisdiction as set forth in section 75-132.01. After all administrative
remedies before the commission have been exhausted, an appeal may be brought
by an interested party to an action. Such appeal shall be in accordance with section 75-136.

Laws 1986, LB 835, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 159;

Laws 1997, LB 660, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 16;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-811;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 57;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 11.
September 6, 2013
All appeals from orders of the Nebraska Public Service Commission are to follow the procedural requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act. Chase 3000, Inc. v. Nebraska Pub. Serv. Comm., 273 Neb. 133, 728 N.W.2d 560 (2007).